Florida, session 2026, HB667.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Subsection (4) of section 316.2068, Florida
Statutes, is amended to read:
316.2068 Electric personal assistive mobility devices;
regulations.—
(4) A person who is under the age of 18 16 years may not
operate, ride, or otherwise be propelled on an electric personal
assistive mobility device unless the person wears a bicycle
helmet that is properly fitted, that is fastened securely upon
his or her head by a strap, and that meets the standards of the
American National Standards Institute (ANSI Z Bicycle Helmet
Standards), the standards of the Snell Memorial Foundation (1984
Standard for Protective Headgear for Use in Bicycling), or any
other nationally recognized standards for bicycle helmets which
are adopted by the department.
Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 1 of 1
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb667-00